Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 63.2-1700.
Application fees; regulations and schedules; use of fees; certain facilities, centers, and agencies exempt.

The Board is authorized to adopt regulations and schedules for fees to be charged for processing applications for licenses to operate assisted living facilities, adult day care centers, and child welfare agencies. Such schedules shall specify minimum and maximum fees and, where appropriate, gradations based on the capacity of such facilities, centers, and agencies. Fees shall be used for the development and delivery of training for operators and staff of facilities, centers, and agencies. Fees shall be expended for this purpose within two fiscal years following the fiscal year in which they are collected. These fees shall not be applicable to facilities, centers, or agencies operated by federal entities.

History.

1983, c. 153, §§ 63.1-174.01, 63.1-196.5; 1988, c. 129; 1991, c. 532; 1992, c. 356, § 63.1-194.3; 1993, cc. 225, 730, 742, 957, 993; 1996, c. 492; 2002, c. 747; 2010, c. 551; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Cross references.

As to placing of children outside of the Commonwealth by agencies licensed by §

63.2-1700

et seq., see §

63.2-1105

.

As to exclusion of information provided to Department of Social Services from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.5

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 758 and 770, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop and make available to child care providers, child day centers, and family day homes training and technical information and assistance regarding compliance with new licensure requirements established pursuant to this act.”

Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, which expires July 1, 2018, in cl. 2 provides: “That every person who is employed by or permitted to serve as a volunteer who will be alone with, in control of, or supervising children at a child day center, family day home, or family day system licensed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 17 (§

63.2-1700

et seq.) of Title 63.2 of the Code of Virginia, child day center exempt from licensure pursuant to §

63.2-1716

of the Code of Virginia, registered family day home, family day home approved by a family day system, or child day center, family day home, or child day program that enters into a contract with the Department of Social Services or a local department of social services to provide child care services funded by the Child Care and Development Block Grant shall undergo a background check described in §

63.2-1720.1

of the Code of Virginia, to be completed by September 30, 2017, or by the date specified on any federal waiver obtained by the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2017, cc. 189 and 751, which expires July 1, 2018, in cl. 3 provides: “That every (i) person who is licensed as a child day center, family day home, or family day system, registered as a family day home, or approved as a family day home by a family day system; (ii) agent of a person who is licensed as a child day center, family day home, or family day system, registered as a family day home, or approved as a family day home by a family day system or who will be involved in the day-to-day operations of the child day center, family day home, or family day system or who is or will be alone with, in control of, or supervising one or more children in a child day center, family day home, or family day system; and (iii) adult living in a licensed child day center or family day home, registered family day home, or family day home approved by a family day system shall undergo a background check described in §

63.2-1721.1

of the Code of Virginia, to be completed by September 30, 2017, or by the date specified on any federal waiver obtained by the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2018, c. 789, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That, notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 17 (§

63.2-1700

et seq.) of Title 63.2 of the Code of Virginia, the Commissioner of Social Services shall issue a license to a facility operated or conducted under the auspices of a religious institution established in 1978 and located in Atkins, Virginia, at the intersection of Pierce Road and Freedom Tabernacle Lane that receives no public funds that meets the minimum standards for licensed child-caring institutions adopted by the Board of Social Services and in effect on January 1, 1987. Such facility shall not be required to comply with regulations governing children’s residential facilities as a condition of licensure.”

Acts 2018, c. 789, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 357 G, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “No child day center, family day home, or family day system licensed in accordance with Chapter 17, Title 63.2; child day center exempt from licensure pursuant to §

63.2-1716

; registered family day home; family day home approved by a family day system; or any child day center or family day home that enters into a contract with the Department of Social Services or a local department of social services to provide child care services funded by the Child Care and Development Block Grant shall employ; continue to employ; or permit to serve as a volunteer who will be alone with, in control of, or supervising children any person who has an offense as defined in §

63.2-1719

. All employees and volunteers shall undergo the following background check by July 1, 2017 and every 5 years thereafter, as required by the federal Child Care and Development Block Grant Act of 2014 (CCDBG).”

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 551 inserted the third sentence in the second paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 75, are identical, and deleted “in consultation with the Child Day-Care Council” following “The Board” at the beginning of the last paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted the second paragraph, which read, “The Board shall develop training programs for operators and staffs of licensed child day programs. Such programs shall include formal and informal training offered by institutions of higher education, state and national associations representing child care professionals, local and regional early childhood educational organizations and licensed child care providers. Training provided to operators and staffs of licensed child day programs shall include training and information regarding shaken baby syndrome, its effects, and resources for help and support for caretakers. To the maximum extent possible, the Board shall ensure that all provider interests are represented and that no single approach to training shall be given preference.”

Law Review.

For comment on contemporary legal aspects of surrogate mother agreements, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 467 (1982).

§ 63.2-1701.
Licenses required; issuance, expiration, and renewal; maximum number of residents, participants or children; posting of licenses.

As used in this section, “person” means any individual; corporation; partnership; association; limited liability company; local government; state agency, including any department, institution, authority, instrumentality, board, or other administrative agency of the Commonwealth; or other legal or commercial entity that operates or maintains a child welfare agency, adult day care center, or assisted living facility.

Every person who constitutes, or who operates or maintains, an assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency shall obtain the appropriate license from the Commissioner, which may be renewed. However, no license shall be required for an adult day care center that provides services only to individuals enrolled in a Programs of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly program operated in accordance with an agreement between the provider, the Department of Medical Assistance Services and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The Commissioner, upon request, shall consult with, advise, and assist any person interested in securing and maintaining any such license. Each application for a license shall be made to the Commissioner, in such form as he may prescribe. It shall contain the name and address of the applicant and, if the applicant is an association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, the names and addresses of its officers and agents. The application shall also contain a description of the activities proposed to be engaged in and the facilities and services to be employed, together with other pertinent information as the Commissioner may require. In the case of an application for licensure as a children’s residential facility, the application shall also contain information regarding any complaints, enforcement actions, or sanctions against a license to operate a children’s residential facility held by the applicant in another state.

The licenses shall be issued on forms prescribed by the Commissioner. Any two or more licenses may be issued for concurrent operation of more than one assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency, but each license shall be issued upon a separate form. Each license and renewals thereof for an assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency may be issued for periods of up to three successive years, unless sooner revoked or surrendered.

The length of each license or renewal thereof for an assisted living facility shall be based on the judgment of the Commissioner regarding the compliance history of the facility and the extent to which it meets or exceeds state licensing standards. On the basis of this judgment, the Commissioner may issue licenses or renewals thereof for periods of six months, one year, two years, or three years.

The Commissioner may extend or shorten the duration of licensure periods for a child welfare agency whenever, in his sole discretion, it is administratively necessary to redistribute the workload for greater efficiency in staff utilization.

Each license shall indicate the maximum number of persons who may be cared for in the assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency for which it is issued.

The license and any other documents required by the Commissioner shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.

Every person issued a license that has not been suspended or revoked shall renew such license prior to its expiration.

Officers, employees, or agents of the Commonwealth, or of any county, city, or town acting within the scope of their authority as such, who serve as or maintain a child-placing agency shall not be required to be licensed.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-23.1, 63-233, 63-234; 1954, c. 259; 1968, cc. 578, 585, §§ 63.1-175, 63.1-196, 63.1-197; 1972, c. 540, § 63.1-196.1; 1973, c. 227; 1974 c. 419; 1975 c. 386; 1979, cc. 461, 483; 1981, c. 222; 1983, c. 153; 1985 c. 384; 1987, cc. 693, 698; 1991, c. 532; 1992, cc. 356, 666, § 63.1-194.5; 1993, cc. 730, 742, 957, 993; 1994, c. 686; 1996, c. 747; 1999, cc. 740, 964; 2000, cc. 178, 203; 2002 cc. 380, 747; 2016, c. 22; 2017, c. 196; 2018, c. 274; 2020, cc. 723, 860, 861.

Cross references.

As to background investigation requirements for employment in children’s residential facilities, see §

63.2-1720

.

For requirement of proof of child’s age and identity upon enrollment in a regulated day program, see §

63.2-1809

.

As to the prohibition on smoking under the Virginia Indoor Clean Air Act, see §

15.2-2824

. As to statute of limitations, see §

19.2-8

. As to day-care facility investment tax credit, see §

58.1-439.4

.

As to power of attorney to delegate parental or legal custodial powers, see §

20-166

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 380 amended § 63.1-196.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 380 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2002 amendment by c. 380 added the fourth sentence in subsection B, and substituted “that” for “which” in subsection G.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 8 provides: “That any valid license that is in effect on July 1, 2021, that was issued by the Department of Social Services under a program that is transferred to the Department of Education pursuant to the provisions of this act shall, on July 1, 2021, be deemed to be a license issued by the Department of Education and shall remain valid and in effect until its expiration date.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 9 provides: “That the initial actions of the Board of Education to adopt, with necessary amendments, the regulations implementing the programs being transferred by this act shall be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia. After transfer of the programs, if the Board of Education determines that additional amendments to the regulations are necessary solely to enable implementation of the programs in accordance with this act, the regulatory actions necessary shall not be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 22 added the second sentence in subsection A and substituted “On the basis of” for “Based on” in subsection C.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 196 inserted subsection A and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 274, in subsection A, deleted “who operates or maintains a child welfare agency” following “As used in this section, ‘person’ ” and added “adult day care center, or assisted living facility” at the end.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 723 added the last sentence of subsection B.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection C, deleted “Licenses issued to child day centers under this chapter shall have a duration of two years from date of issuance” from the end and added subsection I.

§ 63.2-1701.01.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861 transfer certain authority to license and regulate child day programs and other early child care agencies from the Board of Social Services and Department of Social Services to the Board of Education and Department of Education. This section was enacted by Acts 2020, cc. 910 and 911 as §

63.2-1701.01

, and effective July 1, 2021, it will be transferred to § 22.1-289.056 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 63.2-1701.1.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 446, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to reporting by local government of business licenses issued to child day centers and family day homes, see § 22.1-289.012.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-1701.01

, pertaining to local government reporting of business licenses issued to child day centers and family day homes, derived from
2015, cc. 758,
770.

§ 63.2-1702.
Investigation on receipt of application.

Upon receipt of the application, the Commissioner shall cause an investigation to be made of the activities, services, and facilities of the applicant and of his character and reputation or, if the applicant is an association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, the character and reputation of its officers and agents, and upon receipt of the initial application, an investigation of the applicant’s financial responsibility. The financial records of an applicant shall not be subject to inspection if the applicant submits an operating budget and at least one credit reference. In the case of child welfare agencies and assisted living facilities, the character and reputation investigation upon application shall include background checks pursuant to §

63.2-1721

; however, a children’s residential facility shall comply with the background check requirements contained in §

63.2-1726

. In the case of a children’s residential facility, the character and reputation investigation shall also include consideration of any complaints, enforcement actions, or sanctions against a license to operate a children’s residential facility held by the applicant in another state. Records that contain confidential proprietary information furnished to the Department pursuant to this section shall be exempt from disclosure pursuant to subdivision 4 of §

2.2-3705.5

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-223.2, 63-234, 63-235; 1954, c. 259; 1968, cc. 578, 585, §§ 63.1-176, 63.1-197, 63.1-198; 1972, c. 540; 1975, c. 439; 1985, c. 360; 1987, c. 693; 1992, cc. 356, 746 § 63.1-194.6; 1993, cc. 730, 742; 1995, c. 401; 1996, c. 747; 1997, c. 427; 1998, cc. 551, 581; 2002, c. 747; 2005, cc. 610, 924; 2013, cc. 182, 545; 2015, cc. 758, 770; 2020, c. 723, 860, 861.

Cross references.

As to dissemination of criminal history record information, see §

19.2-389

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, which inserted “and assisted living facilities” in the last sentence, in cl. 5 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall convene a task force to develop licensing regulations for assisted living facility administrators and submit an initial progress report by November 1, 2005, and a follow-up progress report by November 1, 2006, on such regulations to the chairmen of the Joint Commission on Health Care, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall adopt final regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective on or before July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 8 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 10 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop a training module on assisted living facilities, including all applicable statutes and regulations, that shall be used to train all adult care licensing inspectors currently employed by the Department no later than October 1, 2005. Any person subsequently employed as an adult care inspector shall receive such training no later than 60 days following the commencement of employment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 11 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall seek consultation and information from all relevant agencies of government in its development of regulations and policies to implement the provisions of the act. The Department of Social Services shall integrate into the regulations and policies standards that are consistent with the recommendations of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] necessary to ensure appropriate care for residents with mental illness, mental retardation, substance abuse, and other behavioral disabilities. The Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] shall cooperate fully in the development of these standards.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 610 and 924 are identical, and inserted “and assisted living facilities” following “child welfare agencies” in the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by c. 182, effective March 12, 2013, and c. 545, effective March 18, 2013, are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 758 and 770 are identical, and inserted “and

63.2-1721

.1” following “63.2-1721” in the third sentence and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 723 added the next to last sentence.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “§

63.2-1721

” for “§§

63.2-1721

and

63.2-1721.1

” in the next to last sentence [now the third sentence].

§ 63.2-1703.
Variances.

The Commissioner may grant a variance to a regulation when the Commissioner determines that (i) a licensee or applicant for licensure as an assisted living facility, adult day center or child welfare agency has demonstrated that the implementation of a regulation would impose a substantial financial or programmatic hardship and (ii) the variance would not adversely affect the safety and well-being of residents, participants or children in care. The Commissioner shall review each allowable variance at least annually. At a minimum, this review shall address the impact of the allowable variance on persons in care, adherence by the licensee to any conditions attached, and the continuing need for the allowable variance.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-233; 1968, cc. 578, 585, § 63.1-196; 1972, c. 540; 1974, c. 419; 1975, c. 386; 1979, c. 483; 1985, c. 384; 1992, c. 666; 1993, cc. 730, 742; 1999, c. 740; 2002, c. 747.

§§ 63.2-1704,
63.2-1704.1.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 446, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to voluntary registration of family day homes; inspections; investigation upon receipt of complaint; revocation or suspension of registration, see § 22.1-289.015.

For current provisions as to unlicensed and unregistered family day homes; notice to parents, see § 22.1-289.016.

For requirement of proof of child’s age and identity upon enrollment in a regulated day program, see §

63.2-1809

.

Editor’s note.

Former § 62.3-1704, pertaining to voluntary registration, inspections, investigations of and registration revocation or suspensions for family day homes, derived from
1991, c. 595,
§ 63.1-196.04;
1992, c. 746;
1993, cc. 730,
742;
2002, c. 747;
2009, c. 29;
2015, cc. 758,
770.

Former § 62.3-1704.1, pertaining to notification of parents by family day homes of unlicensed and unregistered status, derived from
2015, cc. 758,
770.

§ 63.2-1705.
Compliance with Uniform Statewide Building Code.

Buildings licensed as assisted living facilities, adult day care centers and child welfare agencies shall be classified by and meet the specifications for the proper Use Group as required by the Virginia Uniform Statewide Building Code.

Buildings used for assisted living facilities or adult day care centers shall be licensed for ambulatory or nonambulatory residents or participants. Ambulatory means the condition of a resident or participant who is physically and mentally capable of self-preservation by evacuating in response to an emergency to a refuge area as defined by the Uniform Statewide Building Code without the assistance of another person, or from the structure itself without the assistance of another person if there is no such refuge area within the structure, even if such resident or participant may require the assistance of a wheelchair, walker, cane, prosthetic device, or a single verbal command to evacuate. Nonambulatory means the condition of a resident or participant who by reason of physical or mental impairment is not capable of self-preservation without the assistance of another person.

History.

1981, c. 275, § 63.1-174.1; 1986, c. 430; 1989, c. 173; 1991, c. 532; 1992, c. 356, § 63.1-194.4; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1998, c. 552; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to the Uniform Statewide Building Code, see §

36-97

et seq.

§ 63.2-1705.1.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

Effective July 1, 2021, Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, transfer authority to license and regulate child day programs and other early child care agencies from the Board of Social Services and Department of Social Services to the Board of Education and Department of Education. This section was enacted by Acts 2020, cc. 1084 and 1085 as §

63.2-1705.1

, and effective July 1, 2021, it will be transferred to § 22.1-289.057 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 63.2-1706.
Inspections and interviews.

Applicants for licensure and licensees shall at all times afford the Commissioner reasonable opportunity to inspect all of their facilities, books and records, and to interview their agents and employees and any person living or participating in such facilities, or under their custody, control, direction or supervision. Interviews conducted pursuant to this section with persons living or participating in a facility operated by or under the custody, control, direction, or supervision of an applicant for licensure or a licensee shall be (i) authorized by the person to be interviewed or his legally authorized representative and (ii) limited to discussion of issues related to the applicant’s or licensee’s compliance with applicable laws and regulations, including ascertaining if assessments and reassessments of residents’ cognitive and physical needs are performed as required under regulations of the Board.

For any adult day care center issued a license or renewal thereof for a period of six months, the Commissioner shall make at least two inspections during the six-month period, one of which shall be unannounced. For any adult day care center issued a license or renewal thereof for a period of one year, the Commissioner shall make at least three inspections each year, at least two of which shall be unannounced. For any adult day care center issued a license or a renewal thereof for a period of two years, the Commissioner shall make at least two inspections each year, at least one of which shall be unannounced. For any adult day care center issued a three-year license, the Commissioner shall make at least one inspection each year, which shall be unannounced.For any assisted living facility issued a license or renewal thereof for a period of six months, the Commissioner shall make at least two inspections during the six-month period, one of which shall be unannounced. For any assisted living facility issued a license or renewal thereof for a period of one, two, or three years, the Commissioner shall make at least one inspection each year, which shall be unannounced, and as needed based on compliance with applicable laws and regulations.

All licensed child welfare agencies shall be inspected not less than twice annually, and one of those inspections shall be unannounced.

The activities, services and facilities of each applicant for renewal of his license as an assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency shall be subject to an inspection or examination by the Commissioner to determine if he is in compliance with current regulations of the Board.

For any licensed assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency, the Commissioner may authorize such other announced or unannounced inspections as the Commissioner considers appropriate.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-224, 63-247; 1954, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, §§ 63.1-177, 63.1-210; 1972, c. 540, § 63.1-196.1; 1973, c. 227; 1979, c. 73; 1987, c. 698; 1988, cc. 61, 151; 1991, c. 532; 1992, cc. 356, 666, § 63.1-194.7; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1999, c. 964; 2000, c. 130; 2002, c. 747; 2010, c. 603; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Cross references.

As to the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman having access to residents, facilities and patients’ records, see § 51.5-140.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 603, cl. 2 provides: “That by November 1, 2010, the Department of Social Services shall, in consultation with key stakeholder groups, develop specific criteria by which the Department issues one-, two-, and three-year assisted living facility licenses. Such criteria shall be separately stated for each licensure period and shall be unambiguously communicated to all entities seeking initial and renewal licenses.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 603 added the last sentence in subsection A; and in subsection B, in the first paragraph, deleted “assisted living facility or” preceding “adult day care center” in four places and added the last paragraph;

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 75, are identical, and deleted “or Child Day-Care Council, whichever is applicable” from the end of subsection D.

§ 63.2-1706.1.
Inspections of child welfare agencies; prioritization.

The Commissioner shall prioritize inspections of child welfare agencies in the following order: (i) inspections conducted in response to a complaint involving a child welfare agency and (ii) inspections of child welfare agencies that are not conducted in response to a complaint.

History.

2019, c. 273; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in clauses (i) and (ii), substituted “child welfare agency and (ii) inspections of” for “licensed, registered, license-exempt, or unlicensed child welfare agency; (ii) inspections of licensed or registered” and deleted clauses (iii) and (iv), which read: “(iii) inspections of license-exempt or unlicensed child welfare agencies that have entered into a contract with the Department or a local department to provide child care services funded by the Child Care and Development Block Grant, other than inspections conducted in response to a complaint; and (iv) inspections of license-exempt and unlicensed child welfare agencies that are not conducted in response to a complaint.”

§ 63.2-1707.
Issuance or refusal of license; notification; provisional and conditional licenses.

Upon completion of his investigation, the Commissioner shall issue an appropriate license to the applicant if (i) the applicant has made adequate provision for such activities, services, and facilities as are reasonably conducive to the welfare of the residents, participants, or children over whom he may have custody or control; (ii) at the time of initial application, the applicant has submitted an operating budget and at least one credit reference; (iii) he is, or the officers and agents of the applicant if it is an association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation are, of good character and reputation; and (iv) the applicant and agents comply with the provisions of this subtitle. Otherwise, the license shall be denied. Immediately upon taking final action, the Commissioner shall notify the applicant of such action.

Upon completion of the investigation for the renewal of a license, the Commissioner may issue a provisional license to any applicant if the applicant is temporarily unable to comply with all of the licensure requirements. The provisional license may be renewed, but the issuance of a provisional license and any renewals thereof shall be for no longer a period than six successive months. A copy of the provisional license shall be prominently displayed by the provider at each public entrance of the subject facility and shall be printed in a clear and legible size and style. In addition, the facility shall be required to prominently display next to the posted provisional license a notice that a description of specific violations of licensing standards to be corrected and the deadline for completion of such corrections is available for inspection at the facility and on the facility’s website, if applicable.

At the discretion of the Commissioner, a conditional license may be issued to an applicant to operate a new facility in order to permit the applicant to demonstrate compliance with licensure requirements. Such conditional license may be renewed, but the issuance of a conditional license and any renewals thereof shall be for no longer a period than six successive months.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-224.1, 63-236, 63-238; 1954, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, §§ 63.1-178, 63.1-199, 63.1-201; 1981, c. 222; 1985, c. 360; 1987, cc. 130, 692; 1988, c. 199; 1992, cc. 356, 666, § 63.1-194.8; 1993, cc. 730, 742; 1996, c. 747; 1998, cc. 551, 581, 1999, c. 740; 2002, c. 747; 2005, cc. 610, 924; 2013, cc. 182, 545; 2014, c. 118.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, which added the last two sentences in the second paragraph, in cl. 5 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall convene a task force to develop licensing regulations for assisted living facility administrators and submit an initial progress report by November 1, 2005, and a follow-up progress report by November 1, 2006, on such regulations to the chairmen of the Joint Commission on Health Care, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall adopt final regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective on or before July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 8 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 10 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop a training module on assisted living facilities, including all applicable statutes and regulations, that shall be used to train all adult care licensing inspectors currently employed by the Department no later than October 1, 2005. Any person subsequently employed as an adult care inspector shall receive such training no later than 60 days following the commencement of employment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 11 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall seek consultation and information from all relevant agencies of government in its development of regulations and policies to implement the provisions of the act. The Department of Social Services shall integrate into the regulations and policies standards that are consistent with the recommendations of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] necessary to ensure appropriate care for residents with mental illness, mental retardation, substance abuse, and other behavioral disabilities. The Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] shall cooperate fully in the development of these standards.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 610 and 924 are identical, and in the second paragraph, substituted “The” for “Such” at the beginning of the second sentence and added the third and last sentences.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by c. 182, effective March 12, 2013, and c. 545, effective March 18, 2013, are identical, and in the first paragraph, in clause (ii) of the first sentence, inserted “at the time of initial application” at the beginning and substituted “an operating budget and at least one letter of credit” for “satisfactory documentation of financial responsibility such as, but not limited to, a letter of credit, a certified financial statement, or similar documents.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 118, at the end of clause (ii) of the first paragraph, substituted “one credit reference” for “one letter of credit.”

§ 63.2-1708.
Records and reports.

Every licensed assisted living facility, licensed adult day care center, or licensed child welfare agency shall keep such records and make such reports to the Commissioner as he may require. The forms to be used in the making of such reports shall be prescribed and furnished by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-240; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-203; 1978, c. 730; 2000, c. 830; 2002, c. 747; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “or licensed child welfare agency” for “licensed or registered child welfare agency, or family day home approved by a family day system” in the first sentence.